Connecticut, session 2026, HB05060.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subsection (c) of section 12-217g of the general statutes be
amended to increase the maximum amount of the corporation business
tax credit for wages paid to apprentices in the construction trades from
four thousand dollars to seven thousand five hundred dollars per
apprentice.